Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.220

Community-based sealant programs in schools.

For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, a dental hygienist licensed in this state may assess for and apply sealants and apply fluoride, and may remove deposits and stains from the surfaces of teeth in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools:

(1) Without attending the department's school sealant endorsement program if the dental hygienist was licensed as of April 19, 2001; or

(2) If the dental hygienist is school sealant endorsed under RCW 43.70.650.

[ 2019 c 111 s 4; 2009 c 321 s 2; 2007 c 270 s 2; 2001 c 93 s 3.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2009 c 321: See notes following RCW 18.29.056.

Report—2007 c 270: See note following RCW 18.29.056.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2001 c 93: See notes following RCW 43.70.650.